Utah statutes.
41-6a-714.   Freeway and controlled-access highways -- Driving onto and from highways where permitted.

A person may not operate a vehicle onto or from any freeway or other controlled-access highway except at entrances and exits established by the highway authority having jurisdiction over the highway.

